Maryland, session 2025, SB0227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0227*

SENATE BILL 227
Article – Labor and Employment
9–610.1.
The Workers’ Compensation Commission may order an offset or credit against an
award for permanent partial disability benefits for:
(1) any vocational rehabilitation benefits previously provided to a covered
employee; [or]
(2) any temporary total disability benefits previously paid to a covered
employee; OR
(3) ANY BENEFITS PAID BY THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND
THAT WERE ALSO PAID BY THE EMPLOYER.
9–727.
(A) The employer or its insurer shall begin paying compensation to the covered
employee within 15 days after the later of the date:
(1) an award is made; or
(2) payment of an award is due.
(B) THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND SHALL BEGIN PAYING
COMPENSATION TO THE COVERED EMPLOYEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1002 OF
THIS TITLE.
9–1002.
(a) An award is payable out of the Fund in accordance with this section.
[(b) Unless an application for review has been timely filed under subsection (g) of
this section or a notice of timely appeal served, an employer is in default on a claim by a
covered employee or the dependents of a covered employee if the employer fails to:
(1) secure payment of compensation in accordance with § 9–402 of this title;
(2) except for a governmental self–insurance group authorized by § 9–404
of this title, deposit security in accordance with § 9–405 of this title that is:
(i) sufficient to cover a claim by a covered employee; and
(ii) at least $100,000; and

SENATE BILL 227 3
(3) pay compensation in accordance with an award within 30 days after the
date of the award.
(c) If an employer is in default under subsection (b) of this section, promptly after
the expiration of 30 days after the date of the award, the Commission shall notify the
employer that:
(1) the employer is in default; and
(2) the license or permit of the employer to do business in the State may be
suspended.
(d) (1) On receipt of a notice of default, an employer promptly shall pay the
award.
(2) To object to an award, the employer, within 30 days after receipt of the
notice of default, shall notify the Commission of the reasons why the employer objects to
the award.
(3) The notice of objection by the employer to the Commission serves as an
application for review under subsection (g) of this section.
(e) If the employer does not pay the award and does not notify the Commission of
its objection to the award in accordance with subsection (d) of this section, the covered
employee or the dependents of the covered employee may apply to the Director for payment
from the Fund.
(f) On receipt of an application for payment, the Fund may:
(1) pay the award; or
(2) apply for review under subsection (g) of this section.]
(B) IF A CLAIM HAS BEEN FILED AGAINST AN UNINSURED EMPLOYER, THE
COMMISSION SHALL MAKE THE FUND A PARTY TO THE CLAIM BY:
(1) PROVIDING THE FUND WITH NOTICE OF THE CLAIM; AND
(2) SENDING NOTICE TO THE COVERED EMPLOYEE OR THE
DEPENDENTS OF THE COVERED EMPLOYEE THAT ANY DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED
BY THE FUND MUST BE COMPLETED.
(C) AN UNINSURED EMPLOYER SHALL BE GIVEN ACTUAL NOTICE OF A
CLAIM BEFORE ACTION IS TAKEN AGAINST THE UNINSURED EMPLOYER.

SENATE BILL 227
(D) THE FUND MAY RAISE DEFENSES TO A CLAIM, INCLUDING DEFENSES
THAT MAY HAVE BEEN RAISED BY THE UNINSURED EMPLOYER.
(E) THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 9–713 OF THIS TITLE APPLY TO THE FUND
BEGINNING ON THE DATE THAT THE FUND RECEIVES NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) THE FUND MAY IMPLEAD OTHER EMPLOYERS AND INSURERS TO THE
CLAIM.
(g) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE
provisions of Subtitle 7 of this title about procedure and the right to appeal apply to:
(i) a covered employee or the dependents of a covered employee who
file a claim;
(ii) the uninsured employer; and
(iii) the Fund.
(2) The right of review of the Fund includes:
(i) raising issues;
(ii) discovery; and
(iii) a hearing before the Commission.
(H) AN EMPLOYER IS IN DEFAULT ON AN AWARD TO A COVERED EMPLOYEE
OR THE DEPENDENTS OF A COVERED EMPLOYEE IF THE EMPLOYER FAILS TO:
(1) SECURE PAYMENT OF COMPENSATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
9–402 OF THIS TITLE;
(2) EXCEPT FOR A GOVERNMENTAL SELF–INSURANCE GROUP
AUTHORIZED BY § 9–404 OF THIS TITLE, DEPOSIT SECURITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 9–405 OF THIS TITLE THAT IS:
(I) SUFFICIENT TO COVER A CLAIM BY A COVERED EMPLOYEE;
AND
(II) AT LEAST $100,000; AND
(3) PAY COMPENSATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN AWARD WITHIN 30
DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE AWARD.

SENATE BILL 227 5
(I) IF AN EMPLOYER IS IN DEFAULT AND THE COVERED EMPLOYEE OR THE
DEPENDENTS OF A COVERED EMPLOYEE HAS DEMANDED PAYMENT FROM THE
EMPLOYER AT LEAST 15 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE OF APPLICATION, THE COVERED
EMPLOYEE OR THE DEPENDENTS OF THE COVERED EMPLOYEE MAY APPLY TO THE
DIRECTOR FOR PAYMENT FROM THE FUND.
(J) ON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR PAYMENT, THE FUND MAY:
(1) PAY THE AWARD; OR
(2) IF THE FUND HAS NOT YET PARTICIPATED IN A HEARING ON
COMPENSABILITY, FILE ISSUES REQUESTING A HEARING BEFORE THE COMMISSION.
(K) IF THE FUND PAYS AN AWARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE
WHILE AN APPEAL IS PENDING, THE FUND REMAINS ENTITLED TO FULL
REIMBURSEMENT FROM THE UNINSURED EMPLOYER FOR AN AWARD PAID,
NOTWITHSTANDING THE RESULT OF THE APPEAL.
(L) ONCE THE FUND HAS PAID AN AWARD ON A CLAIM, THE FUND SHALL
PAY ANY ADDITIONAL AWARD ORDERED WITHOUT REQUIRING A COVERED
EMPLOYEE OR THE DEPENDENTS OF A COVERED EMPLOYEE TO COMPLETE AN
APPLICATION FOR PAYMENT.
(M) IF THE FUND PAYS AN AWARD TO A COVERED EMPLOYEE OR THE
DEPENDENTS OF A COVERED EMPLOYEE THAT WAS ALSO PAID BY THE EMPLOYER,
THE FUND IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FROM THE COVERED EMPLOYEE OR
THE DEPENDENTS OF A COVERED EMPLOYEE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.